Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5770YC (3) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 ISSUANCE AND DISPLAY OF ONE REGISTRATION PLATE 2 Section 1. Section 321.18, subsection 7, Code 2026, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 7. Any school bus in this state used exclusively for 5 the transportation of pupils to and from school or a school 6 function or for the purposes provided in section 285.1, 7 subsection 1 , and section 285.10, subsection 9 , or used 8 exclusively for the transportation of children enrolled in a 9 federal head start program. Upon application the department 10 shall, without charge, issue a registration certificate and a 11 registration plates plate . The plates plate shall be attached 12 to the front and rear of each bus exempt from registration 13 under this subsection . 14 Sec. 2. Section 321.22, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 15 to read as follows: 16 1. An urban transit company or system having a franchise 17 to operate in any city and any regional transit system may 18 make application to the department, upon forms furnished by 19 the department, for a certificate containing a distinguishing 20 number and for one or more pairs of registration plates to be 21 attached to the front and rear of buses owned or operated by 22 the transit company or system. 23 Sec. 3. Section 321.26, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 24 to read as follows: 25 2. The county treasurer may adjust the registration renewal 26 or expiration date of vehicles for which the county treasurer 27 is responsible for renewal under section 321.40 when deemed 28 necessary to equalize the number of vehicles registered in 29 each twelve-month period or for the administrative efficiency 30 of the county treasurerâs office. The adjustment shall 31 be accomplished by delivery of a written notice to the 32 vehicle owner of the adjustment and allowance of a credit 33 for the remaining months of the unused portion of the annual 34 registration fee, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, 35 -1- LSB 5770YC (3) 91 th/ns 1/ 9 H.F. _____ which amount shall be deducted from the annual registration 1 fee due at the time of registration. Upon receipt of the 2 notification the owner shall, within thirty days, surrender 3 the registration card and registration plates plate to any 4 county treasurer, except that the registration plates plate 5 shall not be surrendered if a validation stickers sticker or 6 other emblems are emblem is used to designate the month and 7 year of expiration of registration. Upon payment of the annual 8 registration fee, less the credit allowed for the remaining 9 months of the unused portion of the annual registration fee, 10 the county treasurer that adjusted the registration renewal or 11 expiration date of the vehicle shall issue a new registration 12 card and registration plates plate , validation stickers 13 sticker , or emblems emblem which indicate indicates the month 14 and year of expiration of registration. 15 Sec. 4. Section 321.34, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are 16 amended to read as follows: 17 1. Plates Plate issued. The county treasurer upon receiving 18 application, accompanied by proper fee, for registration of a 19 vehicle shall issue to the owner one registration plate for 20 a motorcycle, motorized bicycle, autocycle, truck tractor, 21 trailer, or semitrailer and two registration plates for every 22 other motor vehicle . The registration plates plate , including 23 any special registration plates plate , shall be assigned to the 24 owner of a vehicle. When the owner of a registered vehicle 25 transfers or assigns ownership of the vehicle to another 26 person, the owner shall remove the registration plates plate 27 from the vehicle. The owner shall forward the plates plate to 28 any county treasurer or the owner may have the plates plate 29 assigned to another vehicle within thirty days after transfer, 30 upon payment of the fees required by law. The owner shall 31 immediately affix the registration plates plate retained 32 by the owner to another vehicle owned or acquired by the 33 owner, providing the owner complies with section 321.46 . The 34 department shall adopt rules providing for the assignment of a 35 -2- LSB 5770YC (3) 91 th/ns 2/ 9 H.F. _____ registration plates plate to the transferee of a vehicle for 1 which a credit is allowed under section 321.46, subsection 6 . 2 2. Validation stickers. 3 a. In lieu of issuing a new registration plates plate 4 each registration year for a vehicle renewing registration, 5 the department may reassign the registration plates plate 6 previously issued to the vehicle and may adopt and prescribe 7 an annual validation sticker indicating payment of annual 8 registration fees. The department shall issue one validation 9 sticker for each set of registration plates plate . The 10 sticker must specify the month and year of expiration of the 11 registration plates plate . The sticker shall be displayed 12 only on the rear registration plate, except that the sticker 13 shall be displayed on the front registration plate of a 14 truck tractor. A validation sticker issued for the upcoming 15 registration year prior to the expiration of the applicable 16 current registration year does not invalidate the registration, 17 and is not required to be displayed on the registered vehicleâs 18 registration plate until the owner would be considered to be 19 driving a motor vehicle with an expired registration under 20 section 321.39 . 21 b. The state department of transportation shall adopt rules 22 to provide for the placement of the motor vehicle registration 23 validation sticker. 24 Sec. 5. Section 321.37, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 321.37 Display of plates plate . 27 1. Registration plates The registration plate issued for a 28 motor vehicle other than an autocycle, motorcycle, motorized 29 bicycle, or a truck tractor shall be attached to the rear of 30 the motor vehicle , one in the front and the other in the rear . 31 The registration plate issued for an autocycle, motorcycle, 32 or other vehicle required to be registered under this chapter 33 shall be attached to the rear of the vehicle. The registration 34 plate issued for a truck tractor shall be attached to the front 35 -3- LSB 5770YC (3) 91 th/ns 3/ 9 H.F. _____ of the truck tractor. The special plate issued to a dealer 1 shall be attached on the rear of the vehicle when operated on 2 the highways of this state. 3 2. A motor vehicle, other than a truck registered for more 4 than five tons, autocycle, motorcycle, or truck tractor, which 5 is model year 1948 or older, and a reconstructed or specially 6 constructed vehicle built to resemble a model year 1948 vehicle 7 or older, may display one registration plate on the rear of the 8 vehicle if the other registration plate issued to the vehicle 9 is carried in the vehicle at all times when the vehicle is 10 operated on a public highway. 11 3. 2. It is unlawful for the owner of a vehicle to place 12 any frame around or over the registration plate which does not 13 permit full view of all numerals and letters printed on the 14 registration plate. 15 Sec. 6. Section 321.115, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 16 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 c. The owner of a motor vehicle registered under this 18 subsection may display an authentic Iowa registration plate 19 or set of plates from the model year of the motor vehicle, 20 furnished by the person and approved by the department, in 21 lieu of the current and valid Iowa registration plates plate 22 issued for the vehicle, provided that the current and valid 23 Iowa registration plates plate and the registration card issued 24 for the vehicle are simultaneously carried within the vehicle 25 and are available for inspection to any peace officer upon the 26 officerâs request. 27 Sec. 7. Section 321.115A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 28 amended to read as follows: 29 1. A motor vehicle may be registered as a replica vehicle or 30 street rod. The annual registration fee is the fee provided 31 for in section 321.109 , 321.113 , 321.122 , or 321.124 . The 32 owner of a vehicle registered under this section may display 33 a registration plate or set of plates from or representing 34 the model year of the motor vehicle or the model year of the 35 -4- LSB 5770YC (3) 91 th/ns 4/ 9 H.F. _____ motor vehicle the registered vehicle is designed to resemble, 1 furnished by the person and approved by the department, in 2 lieu of the current and valid Iowa registration plates plate 3 issued for the vehicle, provided that the current and valid 4 Iowa registration plates plate and the registration card issued 5 for the vehicle are simultaneously carried within the vehicle 6 and are available for inspection to any peace officer upon the 7 officerâs request. 8 Sec. 8. Section 321.385A, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 9 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10 b. A citation issued for failure to have rear lamps as 11 required under section 321.387 or a rear registration plate 12 light as required under section 321.388 shall first provide for 13 a seventy-two hour period within which the person charged with 14 the violation shall replace or repair the lamps or light. 15 Sec. 9. Section 321.385A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 16 amended to read as follows: 17 2. If the person complies with the directive to replace or 18 repair the headlamp, rear lamps, or rear registration plate 19 light within the allotted time period, the citation shall be 20 expunged. If the person fails to comply within the allotted 21 time period, the citation shall be processed in the same manner 22 as other citations. 23 Sec. 10. Section 321.388, Code 2026, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 321.388 Illuminating plates Registration plate illuminated . 26 Either the rear lamp or a separate lamp shall be so 27 constructed and placed as to illuminate with a white light the 28 rear registration plate attached to the rear of the vehicle and 29 render it clearly legible from a distance of fifty feet to the 30 rear. When the rear registration plate is illuminated by an 31 electric lamp other than the required rear lamp, the two lamps 32 shall be turned on or off only by the same control switch at 33 all times when headlamps are lighted. This section does not 34 apply to commercial vehicles engaged exclusively in intrastate 35 -5- LSB 5770YC (3) 91 th/ns 5/ 9 H.F. _____ commerce that are dump trucks or that are used exclusively for 1 the movement of construction materials and equipment to and 2 from construction projects. 3 Sec. 11. Section 321J.4B, subsection 5, paragraph f, 4 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 (1) If the vehicle subject to the court order is not in 6 the custody of a law enforcement agency, the person or agency 7 designated in the order as the person or agency responsible for 8 executing the order shall, upon receipt of the order, promptly 9 locate the vehicle specified in the order, seize the motor 10 vehicle and the license plates registration plate , and send or 11 deliver the vehicleâs license plates registration plate to the 12 department. 13 Sec. 12. Section 321J.4B, subsection 7, Code 2026, is 14 amended to read as follows: 15 7. a. Upon receipt of a notice of conviction of the 16 defendant for a violation of subsection 2 , the impounding 17 authority shall seize the motor vehicleâs license plates 18 registration plate and registration, and shall send or deliver 19 them to the department. 20 b. The department shall destroy license plates a 21 registration plate received under this section and shall not 22 authorize the release of the vehicle or the issuance of a new 23 license plates registration plate for the vehicle until the 24 period of impoundment or immobilization has expired, and the 25 fee and costs assessed under subsection 10 have been paid. The 26 fee for issuance of a new license plates registration plate and 27 certificates certificate of registration shall be the same as 28 for the replacement of a lost, mutilated, or destroyed license 29 plates registration plate and certificates certificate of 30 registration. 31 Sec. 13. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor may make 32 any change the Code editor deems necessary to correct any Code 33 section or any enacted legislation that refers, in any context, 34 to a set of, a pair of, or two motor vehicle registration 35 -6- LSB 5770YC (3) 91 th/ns 6/ 9 H.F. _____ plates for one vehicle, rather than one registration plate, 1 when there appears to be no doubt as to the proper method of 2 making the correction. 3 Sec. 14. TRANSITION PROVISIONS. The transition from the 4 use of motor vehicle registration plates on both the front and 5 rear of certain vehicles to the use of such plates on only 6 the rear of certain vehicles, as directed by this division of 7 this Act, shall be accomplished in stages. A person applying 8 for a new or replacement registration plate on or after the 9 effective date of this division of this Act shall receive only 10 one registration plate. Otherwise, the transition shall not 11 be accomplished until a new series of registration plates is 12 issued to replace a current series. A person who was issued 13 a pair of registration plates, including special registration 14 plates, may attach only one plate in accordance with this 15 division of this Act on and after the effective date of this 16 division of this Act. A person who is required to transfer a 17 registration plate, or to return a registration plate to the 18 department of transportation or to a county treasurer, shall 19 transfer or return both plates, as applicable, if the person 20 was issued a pair of plates. The department of transportation 21 may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement the 22 transition. 23 DIVISION II 24 WINDOW TINT 25 Sec. 15. Section 321.438, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 26 amended to read as follows: 27 2. a. A person shall not operate on the highway a motor 28 vehicle equipped with a front windshield, a side window to the 29 immediate right or left of the driver, or a sidewing forward 30 of and to the left or right of the driver which is excessively 31 dark or reflective so that it is difficult for a person outside 32 the motor vehicle to see into the motor vehicle through the 33 windshield, window, or sidewing that meets a minimum standard 34 of transparency of less than fifty percent light transmittance . 35 -7- LSB 5770YC (3) 91 th/ns 7/ 9 H.F. _____ a. The department shall adopt rules establishing a minimum 1 measurable standard of transparency which shall apply to 2 violations of this subsection . 3 b. This subsection does not apply to a person who operates 4 a motor vehicle owned or leased by a federal, state, or local 5 law enforcement agency if the operation is part of the personâs 6 official duties. 7